Maine, session 132, LD712.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §1726, sub-§5, ¶C, as enacted by PL 2015, c. 203, §2, is
amended to read:
C. Make recommendations to improve palliative care and the quality of life of persons
with serious illnesses, including recommendations to require hospitals treating patients
under the care of a palliative care physician to defer to the palliative care physician and
the patient when making treatment decisions; and
Sec. 2. Palliative Care and Quality of Life Interdisciplinary Advisory
Council recommendations related to patients under care of palliative care
physician. The Palliative Care and Quality of Life Interdisciplinary Advisory Council, as
established in the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 5, section 12004‑I, subsection 47‑I and
referred to in this section as "the advisory council," shall make recommendations to require
hospitals treating patients under the care of a palliative care physician to defer to the
palliative care physician and the patient when making treatment decisions as required by
Title 22, section 1726, subsection 5, paragraph C. The advisory council shall submit its
recommendations as part of the annual report required to be submitted pursuant to Title 22,
section 1726, subsection 5, paragraph D no later than January 1, 2026 to the Joint Standing
Committee on Health and Human Services. The joint standing committee may report out a
bill related to the advisory council's recommendations to the Second Regular Session of
the 132nd Legislature.